Illinois, session 104th, HB5703.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Mandates Act is amended by changing 5Sections 6 and 8 and by adding Section 9.2 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 805/6)  (from Ch. 85, par. 2206)7    Sec. 6. State Reimbursement to Local Government for For 8Increased Costs Arising From Certain Mandates.9    (a) Any increased costs accruing to local governments as a 10direct result of mandates dealing with the organization and 11structure of local government or due process mandates, as 12defined in subsections (c) and (d), respectively, of Section 3 13above, are not reimbursable by the State.14    (b) At least 50%, but not more than 100% of the increase in 15costs of a local government directly attributable to a service 16mandate as defined in subsection (f) of Section 3 enacted by 17the General Assembly or established administratively after the 18effective date of this Act shall be reimbursed by the State 19unless there is in existence at the time of such enactment a 20program of State aid for the service affected by the mandate 21whereunder the non-local share for any participating local 22government is 50% or greater and where the increased costs 23arising under the mandate constitute allowable expenditures   HB5703- 2 -LRB104 20848 HLH 34450 b1under the aid program. Where all or part of the increased costs 2are met through federal or other external aid, only the net 3increase to the local government shall be included in the base 4against which the amount of State reimbursement is to be 5computed.6    (c) 100% of the loss in revenue of a local government 7directly attributable to a mandated classification or 8exemption of property for purposes of ad valorem real property 9taxation enacted after the effective date of this Act shall be 10reimbursed by the State. The loss of revenue does not include 11potential revenue from property of a type which was not being 12assessed and taxed on January 1, 1980.13    (d) Except for a State mandate that affects personnel 14qualifications for local employees, the salaries and wages of 15which are financed under a State program, and except as 16provided in subsection (e) below, any personnel mandate as 17defined in subsection (h) of Section 3 above enacted by the 18General Assembly or established administratively after the 19effective date of this Act shall be reimbursed by the State to 20the extent of increased costs incurred by local governments 21directly attributable to such mandate.22    (e) All of the increased costs of a local government 23directly attributable to a mandated increase in public 24employee retirement benefits which is enacted after the 25effective date of this Act and which has the effect of 26elevating retirement benefits of local government employees   HB5703- 3 -LRB104 20848 HLH 34450 b1shall be reimbursed by the State; except that any increased 2costs of a local government attributable to Public Act 83-152, 383-374, 83-375, 83-528, 83-558, 83-661, 83-664, 83-737, 483-772, 83-773, 83-780, 83-792, 83-793, 83-802, 83-810, 583-812, 83-823, 83-827 or 83-869 are not reimbursable by the 6State.7    (f) After the effective date of this Act, any bill filed 8and any amended bill that creates or enlarges a State mandate 9of the type specified in subsections (f), (g) and (h) of 10Section 3, shall have provided and identified for it an 11appropriation of an amount necessary to provide the 12reimbursement specified above unless a statement, stating the 13specific reasons for such exclusion is set out in the bill or 14amendment as provided in subsection (a) of Section 8.15    (g) If a local government or combination of local 16governments has been providing a service at its option which 17is subsequently mandated by the State, the State shall pay 18them for the subsequent costs of such program and the local 19government or governments shall proportionately reduce its or 20their property tax extensions by the amount that the State 21payment replaces property tax revenues which were being 22expended on such service. However, for purposes of calculating 23a school district's State aid, no district's operating tax 24rate shall be decreased as a result of reimbursement under 25this Act.26    (h) Any increased costs accruing to a local government as   HB5703- 4 -LRB104 20848 HLH 34450 b1a direct result of the requirements of the Steel Products 2Procurement Act are not reimbursable by the State.3    (i) The provisions of subsections (a) through (h) apply to 4State mandates enacted before the effective date of this 5amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. On and after the 6effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 7Assembly, any State mandate enacted regarding any subject 8matter that necessitates additional expenditures from local 9government revenues shall be appropriated for and reimbursed 10as provided under Section 9.2. 11(Source: P.A. 83-1362.) 12    (30 ILCS 805/8)  (from Ch. 85, par. 2208)13    Sec. 8. Exclusions, reimbursement application, review, 14appeals, and adjudication.15    (a) Exclusions: Any of the following circumstances 16inherent to, or associated with, a mandate shall exclude the 17State from reimbursement liability under this Act. If the 18mandate (1) accommodates a request from local governments or 19organizations thereof; (2) imposes additional duties of a 20nature which can be carried out by existing staff and 21procedures at no appreciable net cost increase; (3) creates 22additional costs but also provides offsetting savings 23resulting in no aggregate increase in net costs; (4) imposes a 24cost that is wholly or largely recovered from Federal, State 25or other external financial aid; (5) imposes additional annual   HB5703- 5 -LRB104 20848 HLH 34450 b1net costs of less than $1,000 for each of the several local 2governments affected or less than $50,000, in the aggregate, 3for all local governments affected.4    The failure of the General Assembly to make necessary 5appropriations shall relieve the local government of the 6obligation to implement any service mandates, tax exemption 7mandates, and personnel mandates, as specified in Section 6, 8subsections (b), (c), (d) and (e), unless the exclusion 9provided for in this Section are explicitly stated in the Act 10establishing the mandate. In the event that funding is not 11provided for a State-mandated program by the General Assembly, 12the local government may implement or continue the program 13upon approval of its governing body. If the local government 14approves the program and funding is subsequently provided, the 15State shall reimburse the local governments only for costs 16incurred subsequent to the funding.17    (a-5) The provisions of subsection (a) excluding the State 18from reimbursement liability under this Act do not apply to 19any State mandate enacted on or after the effective date of 20this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, and all 21subsequent State mandates enacted shall be appropriated for as 22provided under Section 9.2. 23    (b) Reimbursement Estimation and Appropriation Procedure. 24        (1) When a bill is introduced in the General Assembly, 25    the Legislative Reference Bureau, hereafter referred to as 26    the Bureau, shall determine whether such bill may require   HB5703- 6 -LRB104 20848 HLH 34450 b1    reimbursement to local governments pursuant to this Act. 2    The Bureau shall make such determination known in the 3    Legislative Synopsis and Digest. 4        In making the determination required by this 5    subsection (b) the Bureau shall disregard any provision in 6    a bill which would make inoperative the reimbursement 7    requirements of Section 6 above, including an express 8    exclusion of the applicability of this Act, and shall make 9    the determination irrespective of any such provision. 10        (2) Any bill or amended bill which creates or expands 11    a State mandate shall be subject to the provisions of "An 12    Act requiring fiscal notes in relation to certain bills", 13    approved June 4, 1965, as amended. The fiscal notes for 14    such bills or amended bills shall include estimates of the 15    costs to local government and the costs of any 16    reimbursement required under this Act. In the case of 17    bills having a potential fiscal impact on units of local 18    government, the fiscal note shall be prepared by the 19    Department. In the case of bills having a potential fiscal 20    impact on school districts, the fiscal note shall be 21    prepared by the State Superintendent of Education. In the 22    case of bills having a potential fiscal impact on 23    community college districts, the fiscal note shall be 24    prepared by the Illinois Community College Board. Such 25    fiscal note shall accompany the bill that requires State 26    reimbursement and shall be prepared prior to any final   HB5703- 7 -LRB104 20848 HLH 34450 b1    action on such a bill by the assigned committee. However, 2    if a fiscal note is not filed by the appropriate agency 3    within 30 days of introduction of a bill, the bill can be 4    heard in committee and advanced to the order of second 5    reading. The bill shall then remain on second reading 6    until a fiscal note is filed. A bill discharged from 7    committee shall also remain on second reading until a 8    fiscal note is provided by the appropriate agency. 9        (3) The estimate required by paragraph (2) above, 10    shall include the amount estimated to be required during 11    the first fiscal year of a bill's operation in order to 12    reimburse local governments pursuant to Section 6, for 13    costs mandated by such bill. In the event that the 14    effective date of such a bill is not the first day of the 15    fiscal year the estimate shall also include the amount 16    estimated to be required for reimbursement for the next 17    following full fiscal year. 18        (4) For the initial fiscal year, reimbursement funds 19    shall be provided as follows: (i) any statute mandating 20    such costs shall have a companion appropriation bill, and 21    (ii) any executive order mandating such costs shall be 22    accompanied by a bill to appropriate the funds therefor, 23    or, alternatively an appropriation for such funds shall be 24    included in the executive budget for the next following 25    fiscal year. 26        In subsequent fiscal years appropriations for such   HB5703- 8 -LRB104 20848 HLH 34450 b1    costs shall be included in the Governor's budget or 2    supplemental appropriation bills.3    (c) Reimbursement Application and Disbursement Procedure. 4        (1) For the initial fiscal year during which 5    reimbursement is authorized, each local government, or 6    more than one local government wishing to join in filing a 7    single claim, believing itself to be entitled to 8    reimbursement under this Act shall submit to the 9    Department, State Superintendent of Education or Illinois 10    Community College Board within 60 days of the effective 11    date of the mandate a claim for reimbursement accompanied 12    by its estimate of the increased costs required by the 13    mandate for the balance of the fiscal year. The 14    Department, State Superintendent of Education or Illinois 15    Community College Board shall review such claim and 16    estimate, shall apportion the claim into 3 equal 17    installments and shall direct the Comptroller to pay the 18    installments at equal intervals throughout the remainder 19    of the fiscal year from the funds appropriated for such 20    purposes, provided that the Department, State 21    Superintendent of Education or Illinois Community College 22    Board may (i) audit the records of any local government to 23    verify the actual amount of the mandated cost, and (ii) 24    reduce any claim determined to be excessive or 25    unreasonable. 26        (2) For the subsequent fiscal years, local governments   HB5703- 9 -LRB104 20848 HLH 34450 b1    shall submit claims as specified above on or before 2    October 1 of each year. The Department, State 3    Superintendent of Education or Illinois Community College 4    Board shall apportion the claims into 3 equal installments 5    and shall direct the Comptroller to pay the first 6    installment upon approval of the claims, with subsequent 7    installments to follow on January 1 and March 1, such 8    claims to be paid from funds appropriated therefor, 9    provided that the Department, State Superintendent of 10    Education or Illinois Community College Board (i) may 11    audit the records of any local governments to verify the 12    actual amount of the mandated cost, (ii) may reduce any 13    claim, determined to be excessive or unreasonable, and 14    (iii) shall adjust the payment to correct for any 15    underpayments or overpayments which occurred in the 16    previous fiscal year. 17        (3) Any funds received by a local government pursuant 18    to this Act may be used for any public purpose. 19        If the funds appropriated for reimbursement of the 20    costs of local government resulting from the creation or 21    expansion of a State mandate are less than the total of the 22    approved claims, the amount appropriated shall be prorated 23    among the local governments having approved claims.24    (d) Appeals and Adjudication. 25        (1) Local governments may appeal determinations made 26    by State agencies acting pursuant to subsection (c) above.   HB5703- 10 -LRB104 20848 HLH 34450 b1    The appeal must be submitted to the State Mandates Board 2    of Review created by Section 9.1 of this Act within 60 days 3    following the date of receipt of the determination being 4    appealed. The appeal must include evidence as to the 5    extent to which the mandate has been carried out in an 6    effective manner and executed without recourse to 7    standards of staffing or expenditure higher than specified 8    in the mandatory statute, if such standards are specified 9    in the statute. The State Mandates Board of Review, after 10    reviewing the evidence submitted to it, may increase or 11    reduce the amount of a reimbursement claim. The decision 12    of the State Mandates Board of Review shall be final 13    subject to judicial review. However, if sufficient funds 14    have not been appropriated, the Department shall notify 15    the General Assembly of such cost, and appropriations for 16    such costs shall be included in a supplemental 17    appropriation bill. 18        (2) A local government may also appeal directly to the 19    State Mandates Board of Review in those situations in 20    which the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 21    does not act upon the local government's application for 22    reimbursement or request for mandate determination 23    submitted under this Act. The appeal must include evidence 24    that the application for reimbursement or request for 25    mandate determination was properly filed and should have 26    been reviewed by the Department.   HB5703- 11 -LRB104 20848 HLH 34450 b1        An appeal may be made to the Board if the Department 2    does not respond to a local government's application for 3    reimbursement or request for mandate determination within 4    120 days after filing the application or request. In no 5    case, however, may an appeal be brought more than one year 6    after the application or request is filed with the 7    Department.8(Source: P.A. 94-793, eff. 5-19-06.) 9    (30 ILCS 805/9.2 new)10    Sec. 9.2. Unfunded State mandates prohibited. 11Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any 12State mandate regarding any subject matter enacted on or after 13the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 14Assembly that necessitates additional expenditures from local 15government revenues shall be void and unenforceable unless the 16General Assembly makes necessary appropriations to implement 17that mandate. The failure of the General Assembly to make 18necessary appropriations shall relieve the local government of 19the obligation to implement any State mandate. 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.